Virginia statutes. Title 43. Mechanics’ and Certain Other Liens.
Chapter 1. Mechanics’ and Materialmen’s Liens.

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 6 Mechanic’s Liens. § 6.1 et seq. Doug Rendleman.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 97; 16 M.J. Schools, § 2.

§ 43-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term
“general contractor”
includes contractors, laborers, mechanics, and persons furnishing materials, who contract directly with the owner, and the term

“subcontractor”

includes all such contractors, laborers, mechanics, and persons furnishing materials, who do not contract with the owner but with the general contractor. As used in this chapter, the term

“owner”

shall not be construed to mean any person holding bare legal title under an instrument to secure a debt or indemnify a surety. As used in this chapter, the term

“mechanics’ lien agent”

means a person (i) designated in writing by the owner of real estate or a person authorized to act on behalf of the owner of such real estate and (ii) who consents to act, as the owner’s designee for purposes of receiving notice pursuant to §

43-4.01

. Such person shall be an attorney at law licensed to practice in the Commonwealth, a title insurance company authorized to write title insurance in the Commonwealth or one of its subsidiaries or licensed title insurance agents, or a financial institution authorized to accept deposits and to hold itself out to the public as engaged in the banking or savings institution business in the Commonwealth or a service corporation, subsidiary or affiliate of such financial institution. Any such person may perform mechanics’ lien agent services as any legal entity. Provided that nothing herein shall be construed to affect pending litigation.

History.

Code 1919, § 6426; 1922, p. 867; 1932, p. 332; 1977, c. 294; 1992, cc. 779, 787; 1994, c. 382; 2010, c. 341.

Cross references.

As to meaning of the word “judgment” when used in this title, see §

8.01-426

. As to notice of possible filing of mechanics’ lien, see §

11-2.4

.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 341 deleted “in writing” following “consents” in clause (ii) of the third sentence.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1527 (1971).

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1541 (1971).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1426 (1973).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1375 (1976).

For note, “Constitutionality of Mechanics’ Liens Statutes,” see 34 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1067 (1977).

For survey on creditors’ rights in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989).

For article, “Perfection and Enforcement of A Mechanic’s Lien in Virginia:
A Defense Lawyer’s Perspective,” see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 291 (1991).

For 2000 survey of Virginia construction law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 683 (2000).

For article surveying developments in real estate and land use law in Virginia from June 1, 2001 through June 1, 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 271 (2002).

For article, “Construction Law,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 227 (2010).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 35 Limitation of Actions: Statutes of Limitations; Immunities; Res Judicata and Collateral Estoppel. § 35.03 Res Judicata and Collateral Estoppel. Charles E. Friend.

§ 43-2.
Structures, materials, etc., deemed permanently annexed to freehold.

For the purpose of this chapter, a well, excavation, sidewalk, driveway, pavement, parking lot, retaining wall, curb and/or gutter, breakwater (either salt or fresh water), underground or field-constructed above-ground storage tank and connected dispensing equipment, water system, drainage structure, filtering system (including septic or waste disposal systems) or swimming pool shall be deemed a structure permanently annexed to the freehold, and all shrubbery, earth, sod, sand, gravel, brick, stone, tile, pipe or other materials, together with the reasonable rental or use value of equipment and any surveying, grading, clearing or earth moving required for the improvement of the grounds upon which such building or structure is situated shall be deemed to be materials furnished for the improvement of such building or structure and permanently annexed to the freehold.

History.

Code 1919, § 6426; 1922, p. 867; 1932, p. 332; 1962, c. 152; 1968, c. 568; 1976, c. 213; 1996, c. 513.

§ 43-3.
Lien for work done and materials furnished; waiver of right to file or enforce lien.

All persons performing labor or furnishing materials of the value of $150 or more, including the reasonable rental or use value of equipment, for the construction, removal, repair or improvement of any building or structure permanently annexed to the freehold, and all persons performing any labor or furnishing materials of like value for the construction of any railroad, shall have a lien, if perfected as hereinafter provided, upon such building or structure, and so much land therewith as shall be necessary for the convenient use and enjoyment thereof, and upon such railroad and franchises for the work done and materials furnished, subject to the provisions of §

43-20

. But when the claim is for repairs or improvements to existing structures only, no lien shall attach to the property repaired or improved unless such repairs or improvements were ordered or authorized by the owner, or his agent.If the building or structure being constructed, removed or repaired is part of a condominium as defined in §

55.1-1900

or under the Horizontal Property Act (§

55.1-2000

et seq.), any person providing labor or furnishing material to one or more units or limited common elements within the condominium pursuant to a single contract may perfect a single lien encumbering the one or more units which are the subject of the contract or to which those limited common elements pertain, and for which payment has not been made. All persons providing labor or furnishing materials for the common elements pertaining to all the units may perfect a single lien encumbering all such condominium units. Whenever a lien has been or may be perfected encumbering two or more units, the proportionate amount of the indebtedness attributable to each unit shall be the ratio that the percentage liability for common expenses appertaining to that unit computed pursuant to subsection D of §

55.1-1964

bears to the total percentage liabilities for all units which are encumbered by the lien. The lien claimant shall release from a perfected lien an encumbered unit upon request of the unit owner as provided in subsection B of §

55.1-1908

upon receipt of payment equal to that portion of the indebtedness evidenced by the lien attributable to such unit determined as herein provided. In the event the lien is not perfected, the lien claimant shall upon request of any interested party execute lien releases for one or more units upon receipt of payment equal to that portion of the indebtedness attributable to such unit or units determined as herein provided but no such release shall preclude the lien claimant from perfecting a single lien against the unreleased unit or units for the remaining portion of the indebtedness.

Any person providing labor or materials for site development improvements or for streets, stormwater facilities, sanitary sewers or water lines for the purpose of providing access or service to the individual lots in a development or condominium units as defined in §

55.1-1900

or under the Horizontal Property Act (§

55.1-2000

et seq.) shall have a lien on each individual lot in the development for the fractional part of the total value of the work contracted for by the claimant in the subdivision as is obtained by using “one” as the numerator and the number of lots being developed as the denominator and in the case of a condominium on each individual unit in an amount computed by reference to the liability of that unit for common expenses appertaining to that condominium pursuant to subsection D of §

55.1-1964

, provided, however, that no such lien shall be valid as to any lot or condominium unit unless the person providing such work shall, prior to the sale of such lot or condominium unit, file with the clerk of the circuit court of the jurisdiction in which such land lies a document setting forth a full disclosure of the nature of the lien which may be claimed, the total value of the work contracted for by the claimant in the subdivision and the portion thereof allocated to each lot as required herein, and a description of the development or condominium, and shall, thereafter, comply with all other applicable provisions of this chapter. “Site development improvements” means improvements which are provided for the development, such as project site grading, traffic signalization, and installation of electric, gas, cable, or other utilities, for the benefit of the development rather than for an individual lot. In determining the individual lots in the development for the purpose of allocating value of the work contracted for by the claimant, parcels of land within the development which are common area, or which are being developed for the benefit of the development as a whole and not for resale, shall not be included in the denominator of the disclosure statement.Nothing contained herein shall be construed to prevent the filing of a mechanics’ lien under the provisions of subsection A, or require the lien claimant to elect under which subsection the lien may be enforced.

Any right to file or enforce any mechanics’ lien granted hereunder may be waived in whole or in part at any time by any person entitled to such lien, except that a general contractor, subcontractor, lower-tier subcontractor, or material supplier may not waive or diminish his lien rights in a contract in advance of furnishing any labor, services, or materials. A provision that waives or diminishes a general contractor’s, subcontractor’s, lower-tier subcontractor’s, or material supplier’s lien rights in a contract executed prior to providing any labor, services, or materials is null and void. In the event that payments are made to the contractor without designating to which lot the payments are to be applied, the payments shall be deemed to apply to any lot previously sold by the developer such that the remaining lots continue to bear liability for an amount up to but not exceeding the amount set forth in any disclosure statement filed under the provisions of subsection B.

A person who performs labor without a valid license or certificate issued by the Board for Contractors pursuant to Chapter 11 (§

54.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 54.1, or without the proper class of license for the value of the work to be performed, when such a license or certificate is required by law for the labor performed shall not be entitled to a lien pursuant to this section.

History.

Code 1919, § 6426; 1922, p. 867; 1932, p. 332; 1968, c. 568; 1979, cc. 360, 542; 1980, c. 449; 1992, cc. 72, 779, 787; 2002, c. 273; 2004, c. 240; 2010, c. 343; 2012, c. 523; 2013, c. 293; 2015, c. 748; 2018, cc. 79, 325.

Cross references.

As to priorities between mechanics’ liens and liens of employees, suppliers, etc., see note to §

43-24

.

As to liens on franchises and property of transportation, mining and manufacturing companies, see §§

43-24

through

43-26

.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitutions were made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “§

55.1-1900

or under the Horizontal Property Act (§

55.1-2000

et seq.)” for “§ 55-79.41 or under the Horizontal Property Act (§§ 55-79.1 through 55-79.38)” twice, “subsection D of §

55.1-1964

” for “subsection D of § 55-79.83” twice and “subsection B of §

55.1-1908

” for “subsection B of § 55-79.46.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 273, in subsection A, inserted “including the reasonable rental or use value of equipment” near the beginning of the first sentence of the first paragraph, and in the second paragraph, substituted “subsection D of § 55-79.83” for “§ 55-79.83 D” in the third sentence, and substituted “subsection B of § 55-79.46” for “§ 55-79.46 B” in the fourth sentence; and in subsection B, substituted “subsection D of § 55-79.83” for “§ 55-79.83 D” in the first sentence of the first paragraph, and deleted “hereof” at the end of the second paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 240, in subsection A, substituted “$50” for “fifty dollars” and added “subject to the provisions of §

43-20

” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 343 substituted “$150” for “$50” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 523 rewrote subsections B and C.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 293 added subsection D.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 748 inserted the exception at the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence in subsection C.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 79 and 325 are nearly identical, and in the first paragraph of subsection B, inserted “that” following “provided, however”; and in subsection C, inserted “general contractor” in the first sentence and “general contractor’s” in the second sentence. Subsection B is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Law Review.

For comment on mechanics’ liens in Virginia, see 17 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 307 (1960).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1668 (1975).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1375 (1976).

For comment discussing the application of the blanket lien with respect to multi-unit development in Virginia, see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 637 (1979).

For comment, “United States v. Kimbell Foods, Inc.: A Problem or Solution in Resolving Lien Priority Disputes?,” see 36 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1203 (1979).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 217 (1980).

For article on title examination in Virginia, see 17 U. Rich. L. Rev. 229 (1983).

As to waiver of liens, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 517 (1988).

For survey on construction law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 541 (1989).

For article, “Perfection and Enforcement of A Mechanic’s Lien in Virginia:
A Defense Lawyer’s Perspective,” see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 291 (1991).

For 2003/2004 survey of real estate and land use law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 357 (2004).

For article reviewing case law and changes in legislation affecting Virginia construction law, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 143 (2005).

For annual survey article, “Real Estate Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 257 (2006).

For article, “Construction Law,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 227 (2010).

§ 43-4.
Perfection of lien by general contractor; recordation and notice.

A general contractor, or any other lien claimant under §§

43-7

and

43-9

, in order to perfect the lien given by §

43-3

, provided such lien has not been barred by §

43-4.01

C, shall file a memorandum of lien at any time after the work is commenced or material furnished, but not later than 90 days from the last day of the month in which he last performs labor or furnishes material, and in no event later than 90 days from the time such building, structure, or railroad is completed, or the work thereon otherwise terminated. The memorandum shall be filed in the clerk’s office in the county or city in which the building, structure or railroad, or any part thereof is located. The memorandum shall show the names and addresses of the owner of the property sought to be charged, and of the claimant of the lien, the amount and consideration of his claim, the time or times when the same is or will be due and payable, and the date from which interest is claimed, verified by the oath of the claimant, or his agent, including a statement declaring his intention to claim the benefit of the lien, and giving a brief description of the property on which he claims a lien. The memorandum shall also contain the claimant’s license or certificate number issued by the Board for Contractors pursuant to Chapter 11 (§

54.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 54.1, if any, and the date such license or certificate was issued and the date such license or certificate expires. It shall be the duty of the clerk in whose office the memorandum is filed to record and index the same as provided in §

43-4.1

, in the name of the claimant of the lien and of the owner of the property. From the time of such recording and indexing all persons shall be deemed to have notice thereof. A lien claimant who is a general contractor, and not lien claimants under §§

43-7

and

43-9

, also shall file along with the memorandum of lien, a certification of mailing of a copy of the memorandum of lien on the owner of the property at the owner’s last known address. The cost of recording the memorandum shall be taxed against the person found liable in any judgment or decree enforcing such lien. The lien claimant may file any number of memoranda but no memorandum filed pursuant to this chapter shall include sums due for labor or materials furnished more than 150 days prior to the last day on which labor was performed or material furnished to the job preceding the filing of such memorandum. However, any memorandum may include (i) sums withheld as retainages with respect to labor performed or materials furnished at any time before it is filed, but not to exceed 10 percent of the total contract price and (ii) sums which are not yet due because the party with whom the lien claimant contracted has not yet received such funds from the owner or another third party. The time limitations set forth herein shall apply to all labor performed or materials furnished on construction commenced on or after July 1, 1980. An inaccuracy in the memorandum as to the claimant’s license or certificate number, if any, the date such license or certificate was issued, or the date such license or certificate expires shall not bar a person from perfecting a lien if the claimant can otherwise be reasonably identified in the records of the Board for Contractors.

History.

Code 1919, § 6427; 1940, p. 401; 1968, c. 568; 1976, c. 413; 1980, c. 491; 1992, cc. 779, 787; 1999, c. 533; 2003, c. 698; 2007, c. 505; 2013, c. 293; 2019, c. 243.

Cross references.

As to curing of errors and inaccuracies in memorandum, see §

43-15

.

As to oaths, see §§

49-4

through

49-10

.

The 1999 amendment,

in the next-to-last sentence, inserted “(i)” preceding “sums withheld” and inserted “and (ii) sums which are not yet due because the party with whom the lien claimant contracted has not yet received such funds from the owner or another third party.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 698 substituted “90 days” for “ninety days” twice in the first sentence, inserted the present sixth sentence, and substituted “10 percent” for “ten percent” in the present ninth sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 505 inserted “and not lien claimants under §§

43-7

and

43-9

” following “general contractor” in the sixth sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 293 added the fourth and last sentences.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 243 inserted “and addresses” and “and the date from which interest is claimed” in the third sentence and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1527 (1971).

for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1668 (1975).

for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1375 (1976).

for the year 1976-77, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1377 (1977).

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1375 (1978).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1383 (1978).

For comment discussing the application of the blanket lien with respect to multi-unit development in Virginia, see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 637 (1979).

For comment, “United States v. Kimbell Foods, Inc.: A Problem or Solution in Resolving Lien Priority Disputes?,” see 36 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1203 (1979).

For article on title examination in Virginia, see 17 U. Rich. L. Rev. 229 (1983).

For a review of construction law in Virginia for year 1999, see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 827 (1999).

For 2000 survey of Virginia property law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 981 (2000).

For survey article on judicial decisions in real estate law from June 1, 2002 through June 1, 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 223 (2003).

For article reviewing case law and changes in legislation affecting Virginia construction law, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 143 (2005).

For review of judicial decisions of significance in Virginia affecting construction law, see
43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 107 (2008).

For article, “Construction Law,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 227 (2010).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-504 Memorandum for Mechanic’s Lien by General Contractor; No. 6-501 et seq.

§ 43-4.01.
Posting of building permit; identification of mechanics’ lien agent in building permit; notice to mechanics’ lien agent; effect of notice.

The building permit for any one- or two-family residential dwelling unit issued pursuant to the Uniform Statewide Building Code shall be conspicuously and continuously posted on the property for which the permit is issued until all work is completed on the property. The permit shall be posted on the property before any labor is performed or any material furnished on the property for which the building permit is issued. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit a permit being amended after it has been initially issued to name a mechanics’ lien agent or a new mechanics’ lien agent.

If the building permit contains the name, mailing address, and telephone number of the mechanics’ lien agent as defined in §

43-1

, any person entitled to claim a lien under this title may notify the mechanics’ lien agent then named on the permit or amended permit that he seeks payment for labor performed or material furnished by registered or certified mail or by physical delivery. Such notice shall contain (i) the name, mailing address, and telephone number of the person sending such notice, (ii) the person’s license or certificate number issued by the Board for Contractors pursuant to Chapter 11 (§

54.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 54.1, if any, and the date such license or certificate was issued and the date such license or certificate expires, (iii) the building permit number on the building permit, (iv) a description of the property as shown on the building permit, and (v) a statement that the person filing such notice seeks payment for labor performed or material furnished. A return receipt or other receipt showing delivery of the notice to the addressee or written evidence that such notice was delivered by the postal service or other carrier to but not accepted by the addressee shall be prima facie evidence of receipt. An inaccuracy in the notice as to the description of the property shall not bar a person from claiming a lien under this title or filing a memorandum or otherwise perfecting or enforcing a lien as provided in subsection C if the property can otherwise be reasonably identified from the description.In the event that the mechanics’ lien agent dies, resigns, or otherwise becomes unable or unwilling to serve during the construction period, the owner or the general contractor shall immediately appoint a successor mechanics’ lien agent with all the rights, duties, and obligations of the predecessor mechanics’ lien agent. An amended permit shall be displayed as provided in subsection A. Until such time as the successor is named and displayed as provided, notice given hereunder to the predecessor mechanics’ lien agent at the address shown shall be deemed good notice, notwithstanding the fact that the agent may have died, resigned or become otherwise unable or unwilling to serve.

Except as provided otherwise in this subsection, no person other than a person claiming a lien under subsection B of §

43-3

may claim a lien under this title or file a memorandum or otherwise perfect and enforce a lien under this title with respect to a one or two family residential dwelling unit if such person fails to notify any mechanics’ lien agent identified on the building permit in accordance with subsection B above (i) within 30 days of the first date that he performs labor or furnishes material to or for the building or structure or (ii) within 30 days of the date such a permit is issued, if such labor or materials are first performed or furnished by such person prior to the issuance of a building permit. However, the failure to give any such notices within the appropriate 30-day period as required by the previous sentence shall not bar a person from claiming a lien under this title or from filing a memorandum or otherwise perfecting and enforcing a lien under this title, provided that such lien is limited to labor performed or materials furnished on or after the date a notice is given by such person to the mechanics’ lien agent in accordance with subsection B above. A person performing labor or furnishing materials with respect to a one or two family residential dwelling unit on which a building permit is not posted at the time he first performs his labor or first furnishes his material or, if posted, does not state the name of the mechanics’ lien agent, shall determine from appropriate authorities whether a permit of the type described in subsection B above has been issued, the date on which it is issued, and the name of the mechanics’ lien agent, if any, that has been appointed. The issuing authority shall maintain the mechanics’ lien agent information in the same manner and in the same location in which it maintains its record of building permits issued.No person shall be required to comply with this subsection as to any memorandum of lien which is recorded prior to the issuance of a building permit nor shall any person be required to comply with this subsection when the building permit does not designate a mechanics’ lien agent.

Unless otherwise agreed in writing, the only duties of the mechanics’ lien agent shall be to receive notices delivered to him pursuant to subsection B and to provide any notice upon request to a settlement agent, as defined in §

55.1-900

, involved in a transaction relating to the residential dwelling unit.

Mechanics’ lien agents are authorized to enter into written agreements with third parties with regard to funds to be advanced to them for disbursement, and the transfer, disbursement, return and other handling of such funds shall be governed by the terms of such written agreements.

A mechanics’ lien agent as defined in §

43-1

may charge a reasonable fee for services rendered in connection with administration of notice authorized herein and the disbursement of funds for payment of labor and materials for the construction or repair of improvements on real estate.

History.

1992, cc. 779, 787; 2001, c. 532; 2010, c. 341; 2013, c. 293.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “55.1-900” for “55-525.8.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 532 inserted the second paragraph in subsection B and added the last sentence in the first paragraph in subsection C.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 341 inserted the last sentence of subsection A; in subsection B, deleted “at the time of issuance” following “If” and inserted “then named on the permit or amended permit” in the first sentence of the first paragraph, and substituted “An amended” for “The” at the beginning of the second sentence of the second paragraph; and in subsection C, inserted “or, if posted, does not state the name of the mechanics’ lien agent,” “and the name of the mechanics’ lien agent, if any, that has been appointed” and made a minor stylistic change in the third sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 293 added clause (ii) and redesignated former clause (ii) through (iv) as clause (iii) through (v) in subsection B; and made minor stylistic changes in subsection C.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-504 Memorandum for Mechanic’s Lien by General Contractor.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Lien invalidated where notice not strictly enforced. —

Where a general contractor had provided all of the required information to the mechanic’s lien agent, except his address, before bringing an action to enforce the lien, the court found that he still had failed to provide the single-document notice which contained all of the required information, as directed by §

43-4.01

, and accordingly, the court sustained the bank and trustees’ plea in bar and dismissed the action against them; the requirements of subsection B of this section were to be strictly construed. Parish v. Chowdhury, 59 Va. Cir. 239, 2002 Va. Cir. LEXIS 349 (Winchester July 9, 2002).

§ 43-4.1.
Liens to be recorded in deed books and indexed in general index of deeds.

Notwithstanding the provision of any other section of this title, or any other provision of law requiring documents to be recorded in the miscellaneous lien book or the deed books in the clerk’s office of any court, on and after July 1, 1964, all memoranda or notices of liens, in the discretion of the clerk, shall be recorded in the deed books in such clerk’s office, and shall be indexed in the general index of deeds, and such general index shall show the type of such lien.

History.

1960, c. 81; 1964, c. 338; 1968, c. 568; 1985, c. 392.

Cross references.

As to contributions by co-owners for repair or maintenance of common elements, see §

55.1-2014

.

Law Review.

For article on title examination in Virginia, see 17 U. Rich. L. Rev. 229 (1983).

§ 43-5.
Sufficiency of memorandum and affidavit required by § 43-4.

The memorandum and affidavit required by §

43-4

shall be sufficient if substantially in form and effect as follows:

Memorandum for Mechanic’s Lien Claimed by General Contractor. Name of owner: Address of owner: Name of claimant: Address of claimant: Contractor license or certificate number of claimant (if applicable): Issuance date of license or certificate (if applicable): Expiration date of license or certificate (if applicable): If no contractor license or certificate number is included, the claimant certifies that such a valid license or certificate is not required by law for the work done for which the benefit of a lien is claimed. 1. Type of materials or services furnished: 2. Amount claimed:
$
If any part of the Amount claimed is not due as of the date of this mechanic’s lien, identify the date or event upon which it will be due and the sum(s) to which the due date(s) or event(s) apply: 3. Type of structure on which work done or materials furnished: 4. Brief description and location of real property: 5. Date from which interest on the above amount is claimed: Date: It is the intent of the claimant to claim the benefit of a lien. The undersigned hereby certifies that he has mailed a copy of this memorandum of lien to the owner of the property at the owner’s last known address: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . (address), on . . . . . . . .
(date of mailing).
(Name of claimant). Affidavit. State of Virginia, County (or city) of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . ., to wit: I, (notary or other officer) for the county (or city) aforesaid, do certify that . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . claimant, or . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . ., agent for claimant, this day made oath before me in my county (or city) aforesaid that . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . (the owner) is justly indebted to claimant in the sum of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . dollars, for the consideration stated in the foregoing memorandum, and that the same is payable as therein stated. Given under my hand this the . . . . . . . . day of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . ., 20. . . . (Notary Public or Magistrate, et cetera.)

Click to view

History.

Code 1919, § 6427; 1940, p. 402; 1968, c. 568; 2007, c. 504; 2013, c. 293; 2019, c. 243.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 504 inserted the language beginning “It is the intent of the claimant” and ending “(date of mailing)” following Item 5.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 293 added the language beginning “Contractor license or certificate number of claimant” and ending “which the benefit of a lien is claimed” preceding item 1.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 243 inserted the second paragraph of subdivision 2.

Law Review.

For survey on creditors’ rights in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989).

§ 43-6.
Repealed by Acts 1968, c. 568.

§ 43-7.
Perfection of lien by subcontractor; extent of lien; affirmative defense; provisions relating to time-share estates.

Any subcontractor, in order to perfect the lien given him by §

43-3

shall comply with §

43-4

, and in addition give notice in writing to the owner of the property or his agent of the amount and character of his claim. But the amount for which a subcontractor may perfect a lien under this section shall not exceed the amount in which the owner is indebted to the general contractor at the time the notice is given, or shall thereafter become indebted to the general contractor upon his contract with the general contractor for such structure or building or railroad. It shall be an affirmative defense or affirmative partial defense, as the case may be, to a suit to perfect a lien of a subcontractor that the owner is not indebted to the general contractor or is indebted to the general contractor for less than the amount of the lien sought to be perfected.

Where the property referred to in subsection A hereof is a time-share unit, as defined by §

55.1-2200

, the word “agent,” as used in subsection A, shall be deemed to include the developer, during the developer control period, or the time-share estate owners’ association, after the developer control period.Within ten days of receipt of the notice, the developer or the time-share estate owners’ association shall mail by first class mail a copy of the notice to all time-share estate owners whose interests are affected by the subcontractor’s lien on the time-share unit. Failure on the part of the developer or time-share estate owners’ association to so notify the appropriate time-share estate owners within the time period set forth above shall result in the developer’s or the association’s being liable for the full amount of the subcontractor’s claim, but such failure shall not affect the validity of any lien perfected under this section. Assessments levied by the estate owners’ association to pay the liability hereby imposed shall be made only against the time-share estate owners of record in the time-share estate project at the time the liability was incurred.

Where the property referred to in subsection A hereof is a time-share unit, as defined by §

55.1-2200

, the memorandum required to be filed pursuant to §

43-4

need show only the name of the developer during the developer control period, or the time-share estate owners’ association, after the developer control period.

History.

Code 1919, § 6428; 1979, c. 412; 1984, c. 521.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “55.1-2200” for “55-362” twice.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1527 (1971).

for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1668 (1975).

for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1375 (1976).

For survey of Virginia practice and pleading for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1460 (1976).

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1375 (1978).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 217 (1980).

For review of judicial decisions of significance in Virginia affecting construction law, see
43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 107 (2008).

For article, “Construction Law,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 227 (2010).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-506 Memorandum for Mechanic’s Lien by Subcontractor; No. 6-507 Memorandum for Mechanic’s Lien by Subcontractor — Preprinted Form.